lexc-files/prs-num/conditional.txt
!=============================
LEXICON IntrCond
!  person/number markers for
!     intransitive conditional
!=============================
!-----------------------|------------------------|-----------------------|-----------------------|
^[3Sg]:^an      Enclitic; ^[1Sg]:^uma    Enclitic; ^[2Sg]:^uvek  Enclitic; ^[4Sg]:^umi   Enclitic;
                                                                           ^[4Sg]:^uni   Enclitic;
^[3Pl]:^ata     Enclitic; ^[1Pl]:^umta   Enclitic; ^[2Pl]:^ufsi  Enclitic; ^[4Pl]:^umeng Enclitic;
                                                                           ^[4Pl]:^uyeng Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^ayek    Enclitic; ^[1Du]:^umtung Enclitic; ^[2Du]:^uftek Enclitic; ^[4Du]:^umek  Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^agkenka Enclitic;                                                  ^[4Du]:^uyek  Enclitic;
!-----------------------|------------------------|-----------------------|-----------------------|

!===========================
LEXICON TrnsCond
!  person/number markers for
!     transitive conditional
!===========================
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.3Sg]:^agu         Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Pl]:^aki        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Du]:^akek        Enclitic;
^[3Pl.3Sg]:^atgu        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Pl]:^atki       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Du]:^atkek       Enclitic;
^[3Du.3Sg]:^agnegu      Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Pl]:^agneki     Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Du]:^agnekek     Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[1Sg.3Sg]:^umkun       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Pl]:^umki       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Du]:^umkek       Enclitic;
^[1Pl.3Sg]:^umteggu     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Pl]:^umteki     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Du]:^umtekek     Enclitic;
^[1Du.3Sg]:^umtegnegu   Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Pl]:^umtegneki  Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Du]:^umtegnekek  Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:^uvgu        Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Pl]:^ufki       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Du]:^ufkek       Enclitic;
^[2Pl.3Sg]:^ufsigu      Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Pl]:^ufsiki     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Du]:^ufsikek     Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:^uftegnegu   Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Pl]:^uftegneki  Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Du]:^uftegnekek  Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[4Sg.3Sg]:^umigu       Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Pl]:^umiki      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Du]:^umikek      Enclitic;
^[4Sg.3Sg]:^unigu       Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Pl]:^uniki      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Du]:^unikek      Enclitic;
^[4Pl.3Sg]:^umegteggu   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Pl]:^umegteki   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Du]:^umegtekek   Enclitic;
^[4Pl.3Sg]:^uyigteggu   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Pl]:^uyigteki   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Du]:^uyigtekek   Enclitic;
^[4Du.3Sg]:^umegnegu    Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Pl]:^umegneki   Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Du]:^umegnekek   Enclitic;
^[4Du.3Sg]:^unegnegu    Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Pl]:^unegneki   Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Du]:^unegnekek   Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.1Sg]:^anga        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Pl]:^ankut      Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Du]:^ankung      Enclitic;
^[3Pl.1Sg]:^atnga       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Pl]:^ankut      Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Du]:^ankung      Enclitic;
^[3Du.1Sg]:^agnenga     Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Pl]:^ankut      Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Du]:^ankung      Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
! no [1--.1--] forms                                                                               |
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:^uvnga       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:^ufkut      Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:^ufkung      Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:^ufsinga     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:^ufsikut    Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:^ufsikung    Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:^uftegnenga  Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:^uftegnekut Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:^uftegnekung Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[4Sg.1Sg]:^uminga      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Pl]:^umikut     Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Du]:^umikung     Enclitic;
^[4Sg.1Sg]:^uninga      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Pl]:^unikut     Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Du]:^unikung     Enclitic;
^[4Pl.1Sg]:^umegtengnga Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Pl]:^umegtekut  Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Du]:^umegtekung  Enclitic;
^[4Pl.1Sg]:^uyigtengnga Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Pl]:^uyigtekut  Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Du]:^uyigtekung  Enclitic;
^[4Du.1Sg]:^umegnenga   Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Pl]:^umegneku   Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Du]:^umegnekung  Enclitic;
^[4Du.1Sg]:^unegnenga   Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Pl]:^unegneku   Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Du]:^unegnekung  Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.2Sg]:^aten        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Pl]:^asi        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
^[3Pl.2Sg]:^aten        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Pl]:^asi        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
^[3Du.2Sg]:^aten        Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Pl]:^asi        Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[1Sg.2Sg]:^umken       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Pl]:^umsi       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Du]:^umtek       Enclitic;
^[1Pl.2Sg]:^umken       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Pl]:^umsi       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Du]:^umtek       Enclitic;
^[1Du.2Sg]:^umken       Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Pl]:^umsi       Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Du]:^umtek       Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
! no [2--.2--] forms                                                                               |
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[4Sg.2Sg]:^umiten      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Pl]:^umisi      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Du]:^umitek      Enclitic;
^[4Sg.2Sg]:^uniten      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Pl]:^unisi      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Du]:^unitek      Enclitic;
^[4Pl.2Sg]:^umiten      Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Pl]:^umisi      Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Du]:^umitek      Enclitic;
^[4Pl.2Sg]:^uniten      Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Pl]:^unisi      Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Du]:^unitek      Enclitic;
^[4Du.2Sg]:^umiten      Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Pl]:^umisi      Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Du]:^umitek      Enclitic;
^[4Du.2Sg]:^uniten      Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Pl]:^unisi      Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Du]:^unitek      Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.4Sg]:^atni        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Pl]:^asteng     Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
^[3Pl.4Sg]:^atni        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Pl]:^asteng     Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
^[3Du.4Sg]:^atni        Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Pl]:^asteng     Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[1Sg.4Sg]:^umni        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.4Pl]:^umteng     Enclitic; ^[1Sg.4Du]:^umtek       Enclitic;
^[1Pl.4Sg]:^umnni       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.4Pl]:^umteng     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.4Du]:^umtek       Enclitic;
^[1Du.4Sg]:^umtegnegu   Enclitic; ^[1Du.4Pl]:^umtegneki  Enclitic; ^[1Du.4Du]:^umtegnekek  Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[2Sg.4Sg]:^uvgu        Enclitic; ^[2Sg.4Pl]:^ufki       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.4Du]:^ufkek       Enclitic;
^[2Pl.4Sg]:^ufsigu      Enclitic; ^[2Pl.4Pl]:^ufsiki     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.4Du]:^ufsikek     Enclitic;
^[2Du.4Sg]:^uftegnegu   Enclitic; ^[2Du.4Pl]:^uftegneki  Enclitic; ^[2Du.4Du]:^uftegnekek  Enclitic;
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
! no [4--.4--] forms                                                                               |
!-------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
! alternative forms for 4th person subject are described on Jacobson (2001) p.92
! and on p.172 with some discrepancies -> alternative 4Du forms are unclear
